District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.07

Deceptive acts and practices prohibited.

(a)

It is a deceptive telemarketing act or practice for any seller or telephone solicitor to misrepresent any of the following material information:

(1)

The total purchase cost to the consumer of the goods or services to be received;

(2)

The true name of the telephone solicitor; or

(3)

Material aspects of the quality or basic characteristics of the goods or services purchased.

(b)

It is a deceptive telemarketing act or practice for any seller or telephone solicitor to misrepresent any material fact regarding the goods or services purchased that has a tendency to mislead.

(c)

No person shall commit a deceptive telemarketing act or practice.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126g
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3226.11.